Hawaii statutes.
§329-70 Forfeiture. (a) Precursor
chemicals that are possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in
violation of this part shall be subject to seizure and forfeiture as provided
in chapter 712A.

(b) All conveyances, including aircraft,
vehicles, or vessels that are used, or intended for use, to transport or in any
manner facilitate the transportation of precursor chemicals for a purpose that
would constitute a violation of section 329-65(c) or (d), shall be subject to
seizure and forfeiture as provided in chapter 712A.

(c) All moneys, negotiable instruments,
securities, or other things of value furnished or intended to be furnished by
any person in exchange for any of the substances listed in section 329-61 that
facilitate any violation of section 329-65(c) or (d), and all proceeds
traceable to such an exchange, and all moneys, negotiable instruments, and
securities used or intended to be used to facilitate any violation of section
329-65(c) or (d), shall be subject to seizure and forfeiture as provided in
chapter 712A. [L 1990, c 200, pt of §1; am L 2008, c 185, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next